Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-3504
Administration of criminal justice, defined.

Administration of criminal justice shall mean performance of any of the following activities: Detection, apprehension, detention, pretrial release, pretrial diversion, posttrial release, prosecution, defense by a full-time public defender's office, defense by the Commission on Public Advocacy, adjudication, correctional supervision, or rehabilitation of accused persons or criminal offenders. The administration of criminal justice shall include criminal identification activities and the collection, storage, and dissemination of criminal history record information.

Laws 1978, LB 713, § 4;

Laws 2002, LB 82, § 15.